New Jersey, session 221, A1409.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services shall provide Medicaid coverage via the fee-for-service delivery system for eligible services provided by an assisted living residence, a comprehensive personal care home, an assisted living program, or an adult family care provider to an individual who is determined eligible for the Medicaid Managed Long Term Services and Supports program, but who is pending enrollment in a managed care organization contracted by the division to provide health care services to Medicaid recipients.  Fee-for-service coverage provided under this section shall begin on the date on which the individual is determined clinically and financially eligible for the Medicaid Managed Long Term Services and Supports program, and shall end on the date on which the individuals enrollment in a Medicaid managed care organization becomes effective. As used in this section, Medicaid means the Medicaid program established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.). 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt such rules and regulations as the commissioner deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.